Utah statutes.
65A-8-104.   Leaf-It-To-Us Children's Crusade for Trees program created -- Purpose -- Matching funds.

(1)  As used in this section, "program" means the Leaf-It-To-Us Children's Crusade for Trees program.

(2) (a)  The Leaf-It-To-Us Children's Crusade for Trees program is created within the division.

(b)  The purpose of the program is to provide matching funds for the planting of trees on public lands or alongside curbs.

(3) (a)  Any student group may submit an application to the division for funds available through the program.

(b)  To be eligible for the funds, the student group must provide an equal amount of money.

(c)  Both the program funds and the student group's funds shall be used to plant trees on public lands or alongside curbs.

(4)  The division shall make rules to administer the program and place emphasis on post-planting care.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 136, 2007 General Session

